Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-807
Books of record and papers; inspection by Attorney General.

All the books of record and papers of every such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association engaged in business within this state shall be subject to inspection by the Attorney General of this state or by any agent he or she may designate for that purpose, and such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association shall, at such times as he or she shall prescribe, make such further returns, verified as aforesaid as shall be by him or her prescribed, either by general regulations or by special direction.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 8, p. 639;

R.S.1913, § 4052;

C.S.1922, § 3455;

C.S.1929, § 59-808;

R.S.1943, § 59-807;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 362.